Utah statutes.
39-6-111.   Action by military court -- Protection from prosecution.
An action or proceeding may not be prosecuted against the convening authority
or a member of a military court, or an officer or person acting under its
authority or reviewing its proceedings, because of the approval, imposition,
or execution of any sentence, or the imposition or collection of a fine or
penalty, or the execution of any process or mandate of a military court.
